Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB42.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 103. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"3-D printed firearm." Any computer or other electronic file distributed for any firearm or part of a firearm that is intended or capable of being manufactured or printed by a 3-D printer."3-D printer." A computer-driven or otherwise electronic machine capable of producing a three-dimensional object from a digital model.* * *Section 2. The definition of "firearm" in section 908(c) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 908. Prohibited offensive weapons.* * *(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Firearm." Any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.* * *Section 3. The definition of "firearm" in section 913(f) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 913. Possession of firearm or other dangerous weapon in court facility.* * *(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250SB0042PN0015 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection:* * *"Firearm." Any weapon, including a starter gun or a 3-D printed firearm, which will or is designed to expel a projectile or projectiles by the action of an explosion, expansion of gas or escape of gas. The term does not include any device designed or used exclusively for the firing of stud cartridges, explosive rivets or similar industrial ammunition.Section 4. The definition of "firearm" in section 2702.1(c) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 2702.1. Assault of law enforcement officer.* * *(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:* * *"Firearm." As defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9712(e) (relating to sentences for offenses committed with firearms). The term includes a 3-D printed firearm.Section 5. The definition of "firearm" in section 2707.1(d) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 2707.1. Discharge of a firearm into an occupied structure.* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Firearm." Any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosion or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.20250SB0042PN0015 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 6. The definition of "firearm" in section 3901 of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 3901. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this chapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this chapter, the following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Firearm." Any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.* * *Section 7. The definition of "firearm" in section 5515(a) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 5515. Prohibiting of paramilitary training.(a) Definitions.--As used in this section the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:* * *"Firearm." Any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive; or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.* * *Section 8. The definition of "firearm" in section 6102 of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 6102. Definitions.20250SB0042PN0015 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Firearm." Any pistol or revolver with a barrel length less than 15 inches, any shotgun with a barrel length less than 18 inches or any rifle with a barrel length less than 16 inches, or any pistol, revolver, rifle or shotgun with an overall length of less than 26 inches. The barrel length of a firearm shall be determined by measuring from the muzzle of the barrel to the face of the closed action, bolt or cylinder, whichever is applicable. The term shall include a 3-D printed firearm.* * *Section 9. Sections 6105(i) and 6106(e)(1) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms.* * *(i) Firearm.--As used in this section only, the term "firearm" shall include any weapons, including a 3-D printed firearm, which are designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.* * *§ 6106. Firearms not to be carried without a license.* * *(e) Definitions.--20250SB0042PN0015 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) For purposes of subsection (b)(3), (4), (5), (7) and (8), the term "firearm" shall include any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of the weapon.* * *Section 10. The definition of "firearm" in section 6107(c) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 6107. Prohibited conduct during emergency.* * *(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:* * *"Firearm." The term includes any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any weapon.Section 11. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6110.3. 3-D printed firearms.(a) Prohibition.--A person may not use a 3-D printer to create a firearm or any piece or part of a firearm unless the person possesses a license to manufacture firearms under 18 U.S.C. § 923(a) (relating to licensing).(b) Serial number.--A person who possesses a license to manufacture firearms under 18 U.S.C. § 923(a) and uses a 3-D printer to create a firearm or any piece or part of a firearm may not create a firearm or any piece or part of a firearm without including a manufacturer's number.(c) Penalty.--20250SB0042PN0015 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A person who violates subsection (a) shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree.(2) A person who violates subsection (b) shall be guilty of a felony of the second degree.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "firearm" shall have the same meaning as in section 6105(i) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms).Section 12. Sections 6111(f)(1), 6111.2(d), 6111.4 and 6113(d) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(f) Application of section.--(1) For the purposes of this section only, except as provided by paragraph (2), "firearm" shall mean any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.* * *§ 6111.2. Firearm sales surcharge.* * *(d) Definition.--As used in this section only, the term "firearm" shall mean any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosion or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.§ 6111.4. Registration of firearms.Notwithstanding any section of this chapter to the contrary, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow any government or law enforcement agency or any agent thereof to 20250SB0042PN0015 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 create, maintain or operate any registry of firearm ownership within this Commonwealth. For the purposes of this section only, the term "firearm" shall include any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.§ 6113. Licensing of dealers.* * *(d) Definitions.--For the purposes of this section and section 6112 (relating to retail dealer required to be licensed) only unless otherwise specifically provided, the term "firearm" shall include any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.Section 13. The definition of "firearm" in section 6128(f) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 6128. Abandonment of firearms, weapons or ammunition.* * *(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Firearm." Any weapon, including a 3-D printed firearm, which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.Section 14. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0042PN0015 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728